ko: 상호 작용 효과: 요리 지글거리는 효과; 얼음 디스펜서; 조명; 조명 및 사운드; 없음; 문/서랍 열기; 흐르는 물(펌프); 사운드; 물안개/스팀 효과; 작동하는 손잡이/클릭 다이얼; 기타
da: Interaktive effekter: Stege-/sydeeffekt; Isdispenser; Lys; Lys og lyde; Ingen; Låger/skuffer, der kan åbnes; Rindende vand (pumpe); Lyde; Vandtåge-/dampeffekt; Knopper/klikknapper, der virker; Andet
nl: Interactieve effecten: Sissend kookeffect; IJsblokjesmachine; Verlichting; Licht en geluid; Geen; Openslaande deuren/lades; Stromend water (pomp); Geluiden; Waternevel-/stoomeffect; Werkende knoppen/klikkende draaiknoppen; Overig
el: Διαδραστικά εφέ: Εφέ ήχου τσιγαρίσματος; Διανομέας πάγου; Φώτα; Φώτα και ήχοι; Κανένα; Άνοιγμα πορτών/συρταριών; Τρεχούμενο νερό (αντλία); Ήχοι; Εφέ υδρατμών/ατμού; Λειτουργικά κουμπιά/περιστροφικοί διακόπτες με κλικ; Άλλο
ja: インタラクティブな効果: 調理のシズル音エフェクト; 氷ディスペンサー; ライト; ライトとサウンド; なし; ドア/引き出しの開閉; 流水（ポンプ）; サウンド; 水ミスト/スチームエフェクト; 動くノブ/クリック音のするダイヤル; その他
hr-HR: Interaktivni efekti: Efekt cvrčanja pri kuhanju; Ledomat; Svjetla; Svjetla i zvukovi; Ništa; Otvaranje vrata/ladica; Tekuća voda (pumpa); Zvukovi; Efekt vodene maglice / pare; Gumbi koji rade / brojčanici koji klikaju; Ostalo
cs: Interaktivní efekty: Efekt prskání při vaření; Dávkovač ledu; Světla; Světla a zvuky; Žádné; Otevírací dvířka/zásuvky; Tekoucí voda (čerpadlo); Zvuky; Efekt vodní mlhy / páry; Funkční knoflíky / cvakající ciferníky; Jiné
ru: Интерактивные эффекты: Эффект шипения при готовке; Диспенсер для льда; Подсветка; Свет и звук; Нет; Открывающиеся дверцы/ящики; Льющаяся вода (насос); Звуки; Эффект водного тумана/пара; Вращающиеся ручки/щелкающие переключатели; Другое
ro-RO: Efecte interactive: Efect de sfârâit la gătit; Dozator de gheață; Lumini; Lumini și sunete; Niciunul; Uși/sertare care se deschid; Apă curgătoare (pompă); Sunete; Efect de vapori de apă/abur; Butoane funcționale/cadran care face clic; Altele
es: Efectos interactivos: Efecto de chisporroteo; Dispensador de hielo; Luces; Luces y sonidos; Ninguno; Puertas/cajones que se abren; Agua corriente (bomba); Sonidos; Efecto de neblina/vapor de agua; Perillas funcionales/diales con clic; Otro
bg-BG: Интерактивни ефекти: Ефект на цвърчене при готвене; Диспенсър за лед; Светлини; Светлини и звуци; Няма; Отварящи се вратички/чекмеджета; Течаща вода (помпа); Звуци; Ефект на водна мъгла/пара; Работещи врътки/щракащи циферблати; Други
nb: Interaktive effekter: Freselyd for matlaging; Isbitmaskin; Lys; Lys og lyder; Ingen; Dører/skuffer som kan åpnes; Rennende vann (pumpe); Lyder; Vanntåke-/dampeffekt; Fungerende knotter / klikkende skiver; Annet
th: เอฟเฟกต์แบบโต้ตอบ: เอฟเฟกต์เสียงฉ่าตอนทำอาหาร; เครื่องกดน้ำแข็ง; ไฟ; ไฟและเสียง; ไม่มี; ประตู/ลิ้นชักที่เปิดได้; น้ำไหล (ปั๊ม); เสียง; เอฟเฟกต์ละอองน้ำ/ไอน้ำ; ปุ่มหมุนที่ใช้งานได้/แป้นหมุนมีเสียงคลิก; อื่นๆ
sv: Interaktiva effekter: Fräsande ljudeffekt; Ismaskin; Ljus; Ljus och ljud; Inga; Öppningsbara dörrar/lådor; Rinnande vatten (pump); Ljud; Vattendimma/ånga; Fungerande vred/klickande reglage; Annat
pl: Efekty interaktywne: Efekt skwierczenia potraw; Dystrybutor lodu; Światła; Światła i dźwięki; Brak; Otwierane drzwi/szuflady; Bieżąca woda (pompa); Dźwięki; Efekt mgły wodnej/pary; Ruchome pokrętła/klikające tarcze; Inne
vi: Hiệu ứng tương tác: Hiệu ứng xèo xèo nấu ăn; Máy làm đá; Đèn; Đèn và âm thanh; Không có; Cửa/ngăn kéo mở được; Nước chảy (bơm); Âm thanh; Hiệu ứng phun sương/hơi nước; Núm vặn xoay/công tắc bật; Khác
lt-LT: Interaktyvūs efektai: Kepimo čirškimo efektas; Ledo dalytuvas; Šviesos; Šviesos ir garsai; Nėra; Atidaromos durys / stalčiai; Tekantis vanduo (pompa); Garsai; Vandens dulksnos / garų efektas; Veikiančios rankenėlės / spragsintys ratukai; Kita
fi: Interaktiiviset tehosteet: Ruoanlaiton sihinä; Jääpala-automaatti; Valot; Valot ja äänet; Ei mitään; Avautuvat ovet/laatikot; Juokseva vesi (pumppu); Äänet; Vesisumu-/höyryefekti; Toimivat nupit / napsahtelevat säätimet; Muu
sk-SK: Interaktívne efekty: Efekt prskania pri varení; Dávkovač ľadu; Svetlá; Svetlá a zvuky; Žiadne; Otváracie dvierka/zásuvky; Tečúca voda (čerpadlo); Zvuky; Efekt vodnej hmly/pary; Funkčné gombíky/cvakajúce ovládače; Iné
zh-TW: 互動效果: 烹調滋滋聲效果; 飲冰機; 燈光; 燈光與音效; 無; 可開關的門/抽屜; 流水 (水泵); 音效; 水霧/蒸汽效果; 可轉動旋鈕/有聲音的轉盤; 其他
pt-BR: Efeitos interativos: Efeito de fritura; Distribuidor de gelo; Luzes; Luzes e sons; Nenhum; Portas/gavetas que abrem; Água corrente (bomba); Sons; Efeito névoa/vapor de água; Botões e seletores com clique; Outro
de: Interaktive Effekte: Bratgeräusch-Effekt; Eiswürfelspender; Lichter; Licht und Ton; Keine; Türen/Schubladen zum Öffnen; Fließendes Wasser (Pumpe); Töne; Wassernebel-/Dampfeffekt; Funktionierende Drehknöpfe/klickende Regler; Sonstige
tr: Etkileşimli efektler: Cızırdama efekti; Buz pınarı; Işıklar; Işıklar ve sesler; Yok; Açılan kapılar/çekmeceler; Akan su (pompa); Sesler; Su sisi/buhar efekti; Çalışan düğmeler/çıtçıtlı kadranlar; Diğer
en: Interactive effects: Cooking sizzle effect; Ice dispenser; Lights; Lights and sounds; None; Opening doors/drawers; Running water (pump); Sounds; Water mist/steam effect; Working knobs/clicking dials; Other
fr: Effets interactifs: Effet de grésillement de cuisson; Distributeur de glaçons; Lumières; Lumières et sons; Aucun; Ouverture des portes/tiroirs; Eau courante (pompe); Sons; Brouillard d’eau/effet de vapeur; Boutons fonctionnels/cadrans à clic; Autre
it: Effetti interattivi: Effetto sfrigolante da cottura; Dispenser di ghiaccio; Luci; Luci e suoni; Nessuno; Ante/cassetti apribili; Acqua corrente (pompa); Suoni; Effetto vapore/nebbia d'acqua; Manopole funzionanti/quadranti a scatto; Altro
hu: Interaktív effektek: Sercegő hanghatás; Jégadagoló; Fények; Fények és hangok; Nincs; Nyitható ajtók/fiókok; Folyó víz (szivattyús); Hangok; Vízpermet/gőzhatás; Működő gombok / Kattanó tekerőgombok; Egyéb
zh-CN: 交互作用: 烹饪滋滋声效果; 制冰机; 灯光; 灯光和声音; 无; 开门/抽屉; 流水（水泵）; 声音; 水雾/蒸汽效果; 旋钮/拨号盘; 其他
pt-PT: Efeitos interativos: Efeito de chiar ao cozinhar; Dispensador de gelo; Luzes; Luzes e sons; Nenhum; Portas/gavetas que abrem; Água a correr (bomba); Sons; Efeito de névoa de água/vapor; Botões rotativos funcionais/mostradores com clique; Outro
sl-SI: Interaktivni učinki: Učinek cvrčanja pri kuhanju; Ledomat; Luči; Luči in zvoki; Brez; Odpiranje vrat/predalov; Tekoča voda (črpalka); Zvoki; Učinek vodne meglice/pare; Delujoči gumbi/vrtljivi gumbi s klikom; Drugo